Montana, session 2025, HB779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Antisemitism as form of prohibited discrimination -- consideration
of working definition of international holocaust remembrance alliance. (1) In reviewing, investigating, or
determining whether there has been a violation of any relevant policy, law, or rule prohibiting discriminatory
acts, the department shall take into consideration the definition of "antisemitism" as provided in 49-1-102 for the
purposes of determining whether the alleged act was motivated by discriminatory antisemitic intent.
(2) The legal standard that applies to a claim of discrimination arising under state laws protecting
civil rights also applies to a claim of discrimination because of antisemitism.
(3) Nothing in this section may be construed to:
(a) alter the evidentiary requirements for making a determination that conduct, including
harassment, amounts to illegal discrimination or to diminish or infringe on the rights protected under any other
provision of law;
(b) diminish or infringe on protected rights under the first amendment of the United States
constitution or the Montana constitution; or
(c) conflict with federal law or state law concerning discrimination.

Section 2. Section 45-5-222, MCA, is amended to read:
"45-5-222. Sentence enhancement -- offenses committed because of victim's race, creed,
religion, color, national origin, or involvement in civil rights or human rights activities. (1) A person who
has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or who has been found guilty of any offense, except malicious
intimidation or harassment, that was committed because of the victim's race, creed, religion, color, national
origin, or involvement in civil rights or human rights activities or that involved damage, destruction, or attempted
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 779

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 779.1
destruction of a building regularly used for religious worship, in addition to the punishment provided for
commission of the offense, may, if the provisions of 46-1-401 have been complied with, be sentenced to a term
of imprisonment of not less than 2 years or more than 10 years, except as provided in 46-18-222.
(2) An additional sentence prescribed by subsection (1) must run consecutively to the sentence,
except as provided in 46-18-222.
(3) "Antisemitism" is regarded as a form of discrimination on the basis of race, religion, or national
origin and has the same meaning as provided for in the working definition of antisemitism adopted by the
international holocaust remembrance alliance on May 26, 2016, including the "contemporary examples of
antisemitism", and incorporated by reference in Executive Order No. 13899, 84 F.R. 68779, December 11,
2019. When assessing unlawful acts that may have been motivated by antisemitism on the basis of race,
religion, or national origin, the relevant authority shall take into account this definition of antisemitism."

Section 3. Section 49-1-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"49-1-102. Freedom from discrimination. (1) The right to be free from discrimination because of
race, creed, religion, color, sex, as defined in 1-1-201, physical or mental disability, age, or national origin is
recognized as and declared to be a civil right. This right must include but not be limited to:
(a) the right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination; and
(b) the right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodation facilities or privileges of any place
of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement.
(2) "Antisemitism" is regarded as a form of discrimination on the basis of race, religion, or national
origin and has the same meaning as provided for in the working definition of antisemitism adopted by the
international holocaust remembrance alliance on May 26, 2016, including the "contemporary examples of
antisemitism", and incorporated by reference in Executive Order No. 13899, 84 F.R. 68779 December 11,
2019. When assessing unlawful acts that may have been motivated by antisemitism on the basis of race,
religion, or national origin, the relevant authority shall take into account this definition of antisemitism.
(2)(3) This section does not prevent the nonarbitrary consideration in adoption proceedings of
relevant information concerning the factors listed in subsection (1). Consideration of religious factors by a
licensed child-placing agency that is affiliated with a particular religious faith is not arbitrary consideration of
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 779

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 779.1
religion within the meaning of this section."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 49, chapter 2, part 3, and the provisions of Title 49, chapter 2, part 3, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 779